Washington statutes.
RCW 2.64.094

Suspension of judge or justice.

If the commission adopts a recommendation that a judge or justice be removed, the judge or justice shall be suspended, with salary, from his or her judicial position upon filing of the recommendation with the supreme court and until a final determination is made by the supreme court.

[ 1987 c 186 s 6.]